California statutes. Financial Code
 implement outreach and education programs to underserved consumers and communities.

(4) The commissioner may develop and implement initiatives to promote innovation, competition, and consumer access within financial services.

(e) Merchants, retailers, and other sellers of nonfinancial goods and services are excluded from the department’s authority, subject to the following conditions:

(1) The department may not exercise authority under this division as to the following:

(A) The bona fide extension of credit by a merchant, retailer, or seller of nonfinancial goods and services to a consumer for the acquisition of a nonfinancial good or service, provided that all of the following conditions are met:

(i) The credit extended does not significantly exceed the fair market value of the nonfinancial good or service provided.

(ii) The merchant, retailer, or seller does not sell or otherwise assign the debt, except as to the sale of delinquent debt for the purposes of collection.

(iii) The merchant, retailer, or seller of nonfinancial goods and services does not regularly extend credit, as defined under the federal Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.) and regulations issued thereunder.

(B) The collection or sale of delinquent debt arising from credit described in clause (i).

(2) Nothing in paragraph (1) shall limit the department’s authority to the extent that the department finds the sale of the nonfinancial good or service is
 done as a subterfuge, so as to evade or circumvent the provisions of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 7.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

90007.

With respect to funds under this division:

(a) All moneys collected or received by the commissioner under this division shall be deposited with the State Treasurer to the credit of the Financial Protection Fund, which is hereby created. All moneys in the Financial Protection Fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the commissioner for purposes of administering this division.

(b) The department may set and collect an annual registration fee for each entity required to register under subdivision (a) of Section 90009, which may be scaled based on the size or market participation of the entity. The annual registration fee shall be limited to the reasonable regulatory costs
 under this division incident to issuing registrations and performing investigations, inspections, examinations, audits, and supervisory activities; and the administrative enforcement and adjudication of this division with respect to registrants. The regulatory costs for the administrative enforcement of this division are for the purposes of protecting consumers against unfair, deceptive, or abusive acts or practices in connection with any transaction involving the provision of financial products and services in this state; protecting registrants against unfair competition; improving accountability and transparency; and ensuring equitable enforcement of consumer financial laws.

(1) The cost of every inspection and examination of a covered person conducted under the authority of this law shall be paid to the department by the covered person examined and the department may maintain an action for recovery of those costs in any court of competent
 jurisdiction. In determining the cost of any inspection or examination, the department may use the estimated average hourly cost, including overhead, for all persons performing inspections or examinations of licensees or other persons subject to this division for the fiscal year.

(2) Nothing in this subdivision shall alter or supersede the requirements for the cost of an examination conducted under the authority of any other law administered by the commissioner.

(c) (1) The commissioner shall use funds obtained by the commissioner through the enforcement of any of the laws administered by the commissioner, including moneys received through fines, penalties, settlements, judgements, or otherwise, for the administration of this division, whether those funds were received before or after the enactment of this division. This provision shall not be applicable to
 fines, penalties, settlements, or judgments received by any other agency unless the settlement, judgment, or an agreement expressly allocates funds for the administration of this division.

(2) In addition to funds obtained through the enforcement of any of the laws administered by the commissioner, the commissioner may use funds for the administration of this division that are obtained, awarded, delegated, or otherwise attributed to the department through the enforcement of any other consumer, borrower, or investor protection law, regardless of whether the action is brought directly by the commissioner or by another agency or official.

(3) Funds designated as restitution or other ancillary relief to an injured person shall not be subject to this subdivision.

(d) The fees and assessments paid pursuant to this section
 are nonrefundable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 7.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

90008.

(a) The department shall, by rule, establish reasonable procedures to provide a timely response to consumers, in writing where appropriate, to complaints against, or inquiries concerning, a covered person.

(b) The department shall, by rule, require a covered person to provide a timely response, in writing where appropriate, to the department concerning a consumer complaint or inquiry, including all of the following:

(1) Steps that have been taken by the covered person to respond to the complaint or inquiry of the consumer.

(2) Responses received by the covered person from the consumer.

(3) Follow-up actions or planned follow-up actions by the covered person to respond to the complaint or inquiry of the consumer.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not apply to a covered person to the extent it is a consumer reporting agency, as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681a(f)).

(d) With respect to the provision of information to consumers by covered persons, all of the following shall apply:

(1) A covered person shall, in a timely manner, comply with a consumer request for information in the control or possession of that covered person concerning the consumer financial product or service that the consumer obtained from that covered person, including supporting written documentation, concerning the account of the
 consumer.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a covered person may not be required by this section to make available to the consumer any of the following information:

(A) Confidential commercial information, including an algorithm used to derive credit scores or other risk scores or predictors.

(B) Information collected by the covered person for the purpose of preventing fraud or money laundering, or detecting or making any report regarding other unlawful or potentially unlawful conduct.

(C) Information required to be kept confidential by any other provision of law.

(D) Nonpublic or confidential information, including confidential supervisory information.

(E) Information collected, received, maintained, disclosed, sold, or processed pursuant to the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.), but only to the extent subdivision (b) is inconsistent with any provision of the Fair Credit Reporting Act, and then only to the extent of the inconsistency, or to the extent that subdivision (b) imposes a requirement that is otherwise prohibited under Section 1681t(b) of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(3) This subdivision shall not apply to a consumer credit reporting agency subject to Section 1785.10 of the Civil Code.

(e) The department shall promulgate regulations to implement subdivisions (a) and (b) before commencing an enforcement action against a covered person or service provider for a violation of those provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 7.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

90009.

(a) (1) The department may prescribe rules regarding registration requirements applicable to a covered person engaged in the business of offering or providing a consumer financial product or service, including requiring a filing be made under oath, and requiring the payment of registration fees. The department may require registration through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the department shall not require the registration or the payment of a fee by any of the following:

(A) A covered person who is licensed by the department under another law and who is providing a financial product or service
 within the scope of that license.

(B) A covered person who is licensed or registered by another agency unless the covered person is offering or providing a financial product or service that is not regulated by the agency licensing or registering the covered person.

(C) A covered person who is licensed by the department or a federal agency who engages in deposit-taking activity unless the covered person is offering or providing a financial product or service that is not regulated by the agency licensing the covered person.

(b) The following procedures apply to the oversight of persons required to register under subdivision (a):

(1) The department may prescribe rules to facilitate oversight of covered persons and assessment and detection of risks to
 consumers.

(2) The department may require a covered person to generate, provide, or retain records for the purposes of facilitating oversight of those persons and assessing and detecting risks to consumers.

(3) The department may prescribe rules regarding a covered person to ensure that such persons are legitimate entities and are able to perform their obligations to consumers. Such requirements may include background checks for principals, officers, directors, or key personnel and bonding or other appropriate financial requirements.

(c) The department may prescribe rules applicable to any covered person or service provider identifying as unlawful, unfair, deceptive, or abusive acts or practices in connection with any transaction with a consumer for a consumer financial product or service, or the offering of a
 consumer financial product or service. Such rules shall consider the relative harm to the consumer, the frequency of the act or practice in question, and whether such act or practice is unintentional or stems from a technical, clerical, or nonmaterial error. Rules under this section may include requirements for the purpose of preventing those acts or practices.

(1) The department shall interpret “unfair” and “deceptive” consistent with Section 17200 of the Business and Professions Code and the case law thereunder.

(2) The department shall have no authority under this law to declare an act or practice abusive in connection with the provision of a consumer financial product or service, unless the act or practice either:

(A) Materially interferes with the ability of a consumer to understand a term or condition of a
 consumer financial product or service.

(B) Takes unreasonable advantage regarding any of the following:

(i) A lack of understanding on the part of the consumer of the material risks, costs, or conditions of the product or service.

(ii) The inability of the consumer to protect the interests of the consumer in selecting or using a consumer financial product or service.

(iii) The reasonable reliance by the consumer on a covered person to act in the interests of the consumer.

(3) The term “abusive” shall be interpreted consistent with Title X of the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act of 2010 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 5481). Any inconsistency shall be resolved in favor of greater
 protections to the consumer and more expansive coverage.

(d) The department may prescribe rules applicable to any covered person to ensure that the features of any consumer financial product or service, both initially and over the term of the product or service, are fully, accurately, and effectively disclosed to consumers in a manner that permits consumers to understand the costs, benefits, and risks associated with the product or service, in light of the facts and circumstances.

(e) The department, by regulation, may define unfair, deceptive, and abusive acts and practices in connection with the offering or provision of commercial financing, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 22800, or other offering or provision of financial products and services to small business recipients, nonprofits, and family farms. The rulemaking may also include data collection and reporting on
 the provision of commercial financing or other financial products and services.

(f) (1) In conducting any monitoring, regulatory or assessment activity, the department may gather information from time to time regarding the organization, business conduct, markets, and activities of any covered persons and service providers.

(2) The department may require any covered persons and service providers participating in consumer financial services markets to file with the department, under oath or otherwise, in the form and within a reasonable period of time as the department may prescribe by rule or order, annual or special reports, or answers in writing to specific questions, as necessary for the department to fulfill its monitoring, assessment, and reporting responsibilities.

(3) To clarify the
 applicability of state credit cost limitations, including rate and fee caps, to the offering and provision of consumer financial products and services by covered persons, the department may interpret and implement, including to prevent evasion thereof, all California credit cost provisions as to their applicability to consumer financial products and services. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to give the department authority to establish a usury limit applicable to an extension of credit offered or made by a covered person to a consumer, except as otherwise provided for by statute.

(g) If the department and another agency have joint authority, the department shall consult with that agency before promulgating regulations under such laws. The department shall conduct this consultation a minimum of 30 days before the issuance of a notice of proposed rulemaking and a minimum of 30 days before the issuance of any final rule. The
 commissioner may not amend or rescind any regulation promulgated by another department or agency.

(h) The department shall promulgate regulations to implement subdivisions (a), (b), and (d) before commencing an enforcement action against a covered person or service provider for a violation of these provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 7.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

90009.5.

(a) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 90009, the department shall promulgate rules regarding registration requirements applicable to a covered person no later than three years following the initiation of its second action to enforce a violation of this division by persons providing the same or substantially similar consumer financial product or service as the covered person.

(b) The regulation requiring a covered person to register with the department shall become inoperative on January 1, of the calendar year that is four years following the initial year of required registration unless the Legislature takes action to extend the registration or to incorporate the scope of the activity in which the covered
 person is authorized to engage into a new or existing licensing law. The Legislature shall conduct public hearings to obtain input on the desirability or feasibility of extending, revising, or terminating the regulation. Failure of the Legislature to take action pursuant to this section shall not impact the department’s enforcement authority under this division.

(c) The department shall submit to the appropriate committees of the Legislature on or before December 1 before the year a regulation described in subdivision (b) is set to become inoperative, a complete report of the department’s activities related to the covered persons required to be registered by the regulation covering the entire period since the initial year of required registration.

(d) At least once annually, prior to March 15, the commissioner shall appear before and present a report to the appropriate committees
 of the Legislature reviewing all of the activities conducted to implement this division during the prior year and summarizing, with specificity, all of the activities it intends to conduct during the upcoming year. This report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A summary of all enforcement actions taken to implement this division during the prior year.

(2) A review of business models in use among covered persons that it studied during the prior year and a description of which business models in use among covered persons it plans to study during the upcoming year.

(3) A review of all regulations it proposed, or finalized, or on which it sought public feedback during the prior year and a description of all regulations it intends to propose, finalize, or on which it intends to seek public
 feedback during the upcoming year.

(4) A review of all of the activities in which it engaged during the prior year using authority contained in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 90006 and a description of the activities in which it plans to engage during the upcoming year.

(5) A review of all outreach efforts it conducted during the prior year using authority contained in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 90006 and a description of subject matter it plans to include and groups to which it plans to outreach during the upcoming year.

(6) A review of all activities it conducted during the prior year using authority contained in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 90006 and a description of what activities it plans to conduct during the upcoming year.

(7) Any other topic deemed relevant by the commissioner or requested to be covered by a chair of the appropriate committee of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 7.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Oversight [90010. - 90010.]

90010.

(a) This section shall apply to any covered person who meets any of the following conditions:

(1) Offers or provides origination, brokerage, or servicing of loans secured by real estate for use by consumers primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, or loan modification or foreclosure relief services in connection with those loans.

(2) Is a registrant of the department that is required to be registered by statute or by rule.

(3) The department has reasonable cause to determine, by order, after notice to the covered person that the covered person is offering or providing financial products or
 services.

(4) Is a service provider to a person described in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive.

(b) The department may require reports and conduct examinations on a periodic basis of persons described in subdivision (a) for purposes of all of the following:

(1) Assessing compliance with the requirements of consumer financial laws.

(2) Obtaining information about the activities and compliance systems or procedures of that person.

(3) Detecting and assessing risks to consumers, small business, and to markets for consumer financial products and services.

(c) This division shall not be construed to limit the authority of the
 commissioner to require reports from persons described in subdivision (a), as permitted under subdivision (b), regarding information owned or under the control of the person, regardless of whether the information is maintained, stored, or processed by another person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 7.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Enforcement Powers and Duties [90011. - 90017.]

90011.

The commissioner and the department shall have all the investigatory and subpoena powers set forth in Sections 11180 to 11191, inclusive, of the Government Code and any subpoena may further require a person to:

(a) Produce documentary material for inspection and copying or reproduction in the form or medium requested by the department.

(b) File written reports or answers to questions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 7.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

90012.

With respect to the enforcement powers of the commissioner and the department under this division, all of the following apply:

(a) The department may take any action authorized by this law against a covered person or service provider who engages, has engaged, or proposes to engage in unfair, deceptive, or abusive practices with respect to consumer financial products or services.

(b) Relief under this section may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Rescission or reformation of contracts.

(2) Refund of moneys or return of real property.

(3) Restitution.

(4) Disgorgement or compensation for unjust enrichment, with any disgorged amounts returned to the affected consumers, to the extent practicable.

(5) Payment of damages or other monetary relief.

(6) Public notification regarding the violation, including the costs of notification.

(7) Limits on the activities or functions of the person.

(8) Monetary penalties, as set forth more fully in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(c) In any civil or administrative action brought pursuant to this division, the following penalties shall apply:

(1) Any person that violates, through any act or omission, any provision of this division shall forfeit and pay a penalty pursuant to this subdivision.

(A) The penalty amounts are as follows:

(i) For any violation of this division, rule or final order, or condition imposed in writing by the department, a penalty may not exceed the greater of either five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day during which the violation or failure to pay continues, or two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each act or omission in violation.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), for any reckless violation by a person of this division, rule or final order, or condition imposed by the department, a penalty may not exceed the greater of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000)
 for each day during which the violation continues, or ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each act or omission in violation.

(iii) Notwithstanding clause (i) or (ii), for any knowing violation, by a person of this division, rule or final order, or condition imposed by the department, a penalty may not exceed the lesser of 1 percent of the person’s total assets, one million dollars ($1,000,000) for each day during which the violation continues, or twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each act or omission in violation.

(B) In determining the amount of any penalty assessed under this division, the department shall take into account mitigating factors and the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to all of the following:

(i) The amount of financial resources of the person charged.

(ii) The good faith of the person charged.

(iii) The gravity of the violation.

(iv) The severity of the risks to or losses of the consumer, which may take into account the number of products or services sold or provided.

(v) The history of previous violations.

(vi) Other matters as justice may require.

(C) The department may compromise, modify, or remit any penalty that may be assessed or has already been assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 7.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

90013.

The department may bring a civil action in accordance with the following:

(a) If a person violates any provision of this division, rule or final order, or condition imposed in writing by the department, the department may bring an action in the name of the People of the State of California in the superior court to enjoin the acts or practices or to enforce compliance with this law or any rule or order herein under. Upon a proper showing, a permanent or preliminary injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandate shall be granted and a receiver, monitor, conservator, or other designated fiduciary or officer of the court may be appointed for the defendant or the defendant’s assets, or any other ancillary relief may be granted as appropriate. A receiver,
 monitor, conservator, or other designated fiduciary or officer of the court appointed by the superior court pursuant to this section may, with the approval of the court, exercise any or all of the powers of the defendant’s officers, directors, partners, trustees, or persons who exercise similar powers and perform similar duties, including the filing of a petition for bankruptcy. No action at law or in equity may be maintained by any party against the commissioner, or a receiver, monitor, conservator, or other designated fiduciary or officer of the court, by reason of their exercising these powers or performing these duties pursuant to the order of, or with the approval of, the superior court.

(b) If the commissioner determines it is in the public interest, the commissioner may include in any action authorized by subdivision (a) a claim for ancillary relief, including, but not limited to, those listed in subdivision (b) of Section 90012 and a
 claim for penalties as stated in subdivision (c) of Section 90012. The court shall have jurisdiction to award additional relief.

(c) In any action brought by the department, the department may recover its costs in connection with prosecuting the action if the department is the prevailing party in the action.

(d) This section shall not be construed to authorize the imposition of exemplary or punitive damages.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 7.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

90014.

The following limitations apply to actions brought under this division:

(a) Except as otherwise permitted by law or equity, including provisions under any consumer financial law, no civil action may be brought under this division more than four years after the date of discovery of the violation to which an action relates.

(b) In any action arising solely under a California or federal consumer financial law, both:

(1) The limitations period under that consumer financial law shall apply, and not the period under subdivision (a).

(2) The department may commence, defend,
 or intervene in the action in accordance with the requirements of that provision of law, as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 7.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

90015.

(a) The department may conduct hearings and adjudication proceedings with respect to any person in order to ensure or enforce compliance with both of the following:

(1) The provisions of this division, including any rule, final order, or condition imposed by the department, under this division.

(2) Any other law that the department is authorized to enforce and any regulations or order prescribed thereunder, unless that law specifically limits the department from conducting a hearing or adjudication proceeding and only to the extent of that limitation.

(b) All hearings provided for in this division shall be
 conducted in accordance with the administrative adjudication provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

(c) After notice and an opportunity to be heard, the commissioner may, by order, assess penalties under subdivision (c) of Section 90012.

(d) (1) If, in the opinion of the department, any person engages, has engaged, or proposes to engage in any activity prohibited by Section 90003 or 90004, or an activity, act, practice, or course of business that violates a law, rule, order, or any condition imposed in writing on the person by the department, the department may issue an order directing the person to desist and refrain from engaging in the activity, act, practice, or course of
 business.

(2) If that person fails to file a written request for a hearing within 30 days from the date of service of the order, the order shall be deemed a final order of the commissioner.

(e) If any person engages, has engaged, or proposes to engage in any activity prohibited by Section 90003 or 90004, or an activity, act, practice, or course of business that violates a law, rule, order, or any condition imposed in writing on the person by the department, with respect to consumer financial products, the department may include in any administrative action authorized under this section, a claim for ancillary relief as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 90012. The court shall have jurisdiction to award additional relief.

(f) If, in the opinion of the department, any covered person or service provider is engaging,
 has engaged, or proposes to engage in an activity, act, practice, or course of business that violates a law, rule, order, or any condition imposed in writing on the person by the department, the department may, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, suspend or revoke the license or registration of the covered person or service provider.

(g) After the exhaustion of the review procedures provided for in this section, the commissioner may apply to the appropriate superior court for an order compelling the cited licensee or person to comply with the orders of the commissioner.

(1) The application shall include a certified copy of the final order of the commissioner.

(2) Upon the filing of the application, the superior court shall set a date for a hearing for an order to show cause why judgment should not be
 entered, which shall be set not less than 30 calendar days from the date the application is filed.

(3) The commissioner shall serve a copy of the application and final order along with notice of the hearing to all entities or persons cited in the order against whom a civil judgment is sought not less than 15 calendar days before the date set for the hearing. Service of the application shall be pursuant to the methods specified by Article 3 (commencing with Section 415.10) of Chapter 4 of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure for service of summons.

(4) The court shall consider the filing of a certified copy of the final order of the commissioner and the proof of service of the application and notice of the hearing on the persons or entities against whom the judgment is sought, a sufficient prima facie showing to warrant the issuance of the civil judgment and order at
 the hearing. The respondent bears the burden of showing by affirmative evidence at the hearing why the order of the commissioner is not final, or why the timely notice of application and hearing was not provided to avoid judgment being entered by the superior court. Any method of service authorized by laws under which the final order was issued, including those methods under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code is considered valid service for the purposes of determining whether the order of the commissioner is final.

(5) The respondent shall not be allowed to raise any defenses or present any evidence at the hearing on the application that had been or could have been raised by the respondent at an administrative hearing to challenge the commissioner’s order, or in an appeal or writ from such proceedings.

(6) The
 judgment issued pursuant to paragraph (4) of this subdivision may be for injunctive relief or payment of ancillary relief or penalties. The judgment may be enforced by the court pursuant to the procedures authorized for any other civil judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 7.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

90016.

The commissioner shall not outsource or delegate enforcement authority under this division to a private attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 7.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

90017.

In regard to cooperation with the Attorney General, the following provisions apply:

(a) The department may enter into an agreement with the Attorney General with respect to civil actions by each agency.

(b) A provision of this division, any regulation or order made under the authority of this division, or any agreement under this subdivision shall not do any of the following:

(1) Limit the powers or authorities of the Attorney General, including, but not limited to, the Attorney General’s ability to prosecute violations of civil or criminal laws.

(2) Limit the rights
 of any consumer, or the obligations of any covered person or service provider, under the Unfair Competition Law, the False Advertising Law, or any consumer financial law.

(c) (1) If the department obtains evidence that a person has engaged in conduct that may constitute a violation of criminal law, the department shall transmit that evidence to the Attorney General.

(2) This subdivision shall not affect any other authority of the department to disclose information.

(d) (1) This section shall not be construed to limit the authority of the department under this division to cooperate with any regulatory or law enforcement body.

(2) The department shall notify other regulatory agencies that will be impacted by the
 department’s actions under this division.

(e) Nothing in this division shall limit the ability of any district attorney or any city attorney lawfully permitted pursuant to Section 17204 of the Business and Professions Code to bring actions or obtain relief pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code. Remedies sought and obtained by district attorneys and city attorneys pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code shall be cumulative to remedies set forth in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 7.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Annual Report [90018. - 90018.]

90018.

(a) The commissioner shall prepare and publish on the department’s internet website an annual report detailing actions taken during the prior year under this law.

(b) The report described in subdivision (a) shall include, but not be limited to, information on actions taken with respect to all of the following:

(1) Rulemaking, enforcement, oversight, consumer complaints and resolutions, education, and research.

(2) The activities of the Financial Technology Innovation Office.

(3) The activities
 of the Office of the Ombuds.

(c) The report may include recommendations, including those intended to result in improved oversight, greater transparency, or increased availability of beneficial financial products and services in the marketplace.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 162, Sec. 1.   (AB 665)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Miscellaneous [90019. - 90019.]

90019.

(a) The provisions of this division shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

(b) The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this division, or amendments to it, or regulations promulgated under it, or under such amendments, is held invalid, illegal, or unenforceable, then that invalidity, illegality, or unenforceability shall not affect other provisions, amendments, or regulations that can be given effect without the invalid, illegal, or unenforceable provision, amendment, or regulation. Any invalidity, illegality, or unenforceability shall be construed as narrowly as possible and shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in
 which such judgment shall have been rendered and to the person or circumstances involved.

(c) To the extent that any provision of this division is preempted by federal law, the provision shall not apply and shall not be enforced solely as to the extent of the preemption and not as to other circumstances, persons, or applications.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 7.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 25. DEBT COLLECTION LICENSING ACT [100000. - 100025.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [100000. - 100002.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title [100000. - 100000.7.]

100000.

This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the Debt Collection Licensing Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   (SB 908)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Sec. 100000.5.)
-------------------------------------------

100000.5.

(a) The commissioner shall allow any debt collector that submits an application before January 1, 2023, to operate pending the approval or denial of the application.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 100011, the commissioner may issue a conditional license to an applicant pending compliance with the requirements of subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 100008.

(2) A conditional license issued pursuant to this subdivision shall expire at the earliest of the following:

(A) Ninety days after the requirements of Sections 100007, 100008, and 100009 have been satisfied.

(B) Upon the issuance of an unconditional license.

(C) Ninety days after the commissioner directs the licensee in writing to submit fingerprints for submission to the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 100008, if the licensee fails to submit a set of fingerprints for each individual described in Section 100009.

(D) Upon the denial,
 pursuant to Section 100012, of a license application.

(c) The commissioner may deny an application under Section 100012 at any time before the issuance of an unconditional license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 569, Sec. 10.   (AB 156)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

100000.7.

No county, city, or other political subdivision within this state shall require a debt collector to be licensed or to register as a debt collector.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   (SB 908)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Sec. 100000.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Requirements for Licensure [100001. - 100001.]

100001.

(a) No person shall engage in the business of debt collection in this state without first obtaining a license pursuant to this division. To the extent permitted by federal law, a person is acting in this state if the person is located in this state and is seeking to collect from a debtor that resides inside or outside the state, or is located outside of the state and is seeking to collect from a debtor that resides in this state. A license shall be obtained for the licensee’s principal place of business and shall not be transferred or assigned. A separate license is not required for each individual branch office.
